zh-CN: 弓具兼容性: 复合弓; 十字弓; 反曲弓; 传统弓; 通用型; 其他
fi: Jousen yhteensopivuus: Taljajousi; Varsijousi; Vastakaarijousi; Perinteinen jousi; Universaali; Muu
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea arcușului: Arc compound; Arbaletă; Arc recurve; Arc tradițional; Universal; Altele
en: Bow compatibility: Compound bow; Crossbow; Recurve bow; Traditional bow; Universal; Other
vi: Độ tương thích của cây vĩ: Cung ròng rọc; Nỏ; Cung uốn; Cung truyền thống; Đa năng; Khác
de: Bogenkompatibilität: Compoundbogen; Armbrust; Recurvebogen; Traditioneller Bogen; Universal; Sonstige
pt-PT: Compatibilidade do arco: Arco composto; Besta; Arco recurvo; Arco tradicional; Universal; Outro
zh-TW: 弓相容性: 複合弓; 十字弓; 反曲弓; 傳統弓; 通用; 其他
ru: Совместимость лука: Блочный лук; Арбалет; Рекурсивный лук; Традиционный лук; Универсальный; Другое
pl: Zgodność łuków: Łuk bloczkowy; Kusza; Łuk klasyczny (recurve); Łuk tradycyjny; Uniwersalne; Inne
hu: Vonó kompatibilitása: Csigás íj; Számszeríj; Reflexíj; Tradicionális íj; Univerzális; Egyéb
bg-BG: Съвместимост на лъка: Компаунд лък; Арбалет; Рикърв лък; Традиционен лък; Универсална; Друго
lt-LT: Lanko suderinamumas: Skriemuliniams lankams; Arbaletams; Lenktiems lankams; Tradiciniams lankams; Universalus; Kitas
sv: Kompatibel med båge: Compoundbåge; Armborst; Recurvebåge; Traditionell båge; Universell; Annan
es: Compatibilidad del arco: Arco compuesto; Ballesta; Arco recurvo; Arco tradicional; Universal; Otro
da: Buekompatabilitet: Compoundbue; Armbrøst; Recurvebue; Traditionel bue; Universal; Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost s lukom: Složeni luk; Samostrijel; Zakrivljeni luk; Tradicionalni luk; Univerzalno; Ostalo
ko: 활 호환성: 컴파운드 보우; 석궁; 리커브 보우; 전통 활; 범용; 기타
fr: Compatibilité avec les arcs: Arc à poulies; Arbalète; Arc classique; Arc traditionnel; Universel; Autre
pt-BR: Compatibilidade do arco: Arco composto; Balestra; Arco recurvo; Arco tradicional; Universal; Outros
ja: ボウ適合性: コンパウンドボウ; クロスボウ; リカーブボウ; トラディショナルボウ; ユニバーサル; その他
it: Compatibilità dell'arco: Arco compound; Balestra; Arco ricurvo; Arco tradizionale; Universale; Altro
el: Συμβατότητα τόξου: Σύνθετο τόξο; Βαλλίστρα; Επανακυρτωμένο τόξο; Παραδοσιακό τόξο; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
tr: Yay uyumluluğu: Makaralı yay; Tatar yayı; Klasik yay; Geleneksel yay; Evrensel; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilita sláčika: Kladkový luk; Kuša; Reflexný luk; Tradičný luk; Univerzálne; Iné
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับคันธนู: ธนูทดกำลัง; หน้าไม้; ธนูรีเคิร์ฟ; ธนูโบราณ; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
nl: Type boog: Compoundboog; Kruisboog; Recurveboog; Traditionele boog; Universeel; Overige
nb: Buekompatibilitet: Trinsebue; Armbrøst; Rekurvbue; Tradisjonell bue; Universell; Annet
sl-SI: Združljivost loka: Sestavljeni lok; Samostrel; Ukrivljeni lok; Tradicionalni lok; Univerzalno; Drugo
cs: Kompatibilita s luky: Kladkový luk; Kuše; Zvratný luk; Tradiční luk; Univerzální; Jiné